Wisconsin, session 2025, AB389.
do enact as follows:AB389,11Section 1. 45.01 (12) (L) of the statutes is created to read:AB389,2,5245.01 (12) (L) For purposes of ss. 343.14 and 343.17 only, a former member of 3the U.S. armed forces, a reserve unit of the U.S. armed forces, or the national guard 4who meets the eligibility requirements for a veterans home loan established by the 5U.S. department of veterans affairs.AB389,26Section 2. Initial applicability.AB389,2,87(1) This act first applies to applications that are received by the department of 8transportation on the effective date of this subsection.AB389,2,99